Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2627
Fee per animal unit; department assess.

The department shall assess a fee not to exceed two cents per animal unit reported under sections 54-2613 and 54-2623 as direct-purchased or contract-purchased.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 27.